Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.06
Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center; appropriations.

It is the intent of the Legislature of Nebraska to appropriate to the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center Fund an amount sufficient for the costs and payments to be made by the State of Nebraska to the city of Grand Island for the lease by the state of the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center including an amount sufficient for operation and maintenance and lease payments sufficient to pay the principal and interest on the bonds issued by the city of Grand Island to finance such building and to maintain any required amounts in any bond and bond reserve funds.

Laws 1978, LB 877, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 593, § 16;

Laws 1986, LB 258, § 40.